Massachusetts, session 194th, H2326.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The General Court hereby finds and declares that the use of the so-called
Dover amendment by nonprofit institutions to avoid wetland or natural resource area protections
may be harmful to the public health and environment.
SECTION 2. Section 3 of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 53, the words “restrict the” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- restrict, other than through wetlands or natural
resource area protections.
of 1